Utah statutes.
59-14-304.   Transitional inventory tax on tobacco products -- Penalties and
interest for failure to comply.
(1)  In addition to the tax described in Section 59-14-302, there is imposed,
beginning on July 1, 2010, an inventory tax on all tobacco products subject to
the tax described in Section 59-14-302, upon the sale, use, or storage of
those tobacco products in the state, as follows:
(a)  the tax imposed in this section applies only to tobacco products sold,
used, or stored in the state on or after July 1, 2010:
(i)  for which the tax was paid at the tax rate imposed under Section
59-14-302 that was applicable on June 30, 2010; and
(ii)  for which the tax imposed in this section has not been paid; and
(b)  the tax imposed in this section is equal to the difference between:
(i)  the tax imposed on those tobacco products under Section 59-14-302,
beginning on July 1, 2010; and
(ii)  the tax imposed on those tobacco products under Section 59-14-302 on or
before June 30, 2010.
(2)  The tax imposed in this section shall be paid by the manufacturer,
jobber, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer.
(3)  A person described in Subsection (2) shall remit the tax imposed in this
section, in a return prescribed by the commission, on or before July 31, 2010.
(4)  Failure of a person to comply with the requirements of this section
subjects the person to the penalties and interest described in Sections
59-1-401 and 59-1-402.
(5)  The commission may not waive the interest or penalties imposed on a
person for failure to comply with the requirements of this section.
